Utah statutes.
38-1-14.   Decree -- Order of satisfaction.
In every case in which liens are claimed against the same property the decree
shall provide for their satisfaction in the following order:
(1)  Subcontractors who are laborers or mechanics working by the day or piece,
but without furnishing materials therefor;
(2)  All other subcontractors and all materialmen;
(3)  The original contractors.
